Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.232.020

Calculation and allocation of appropriations.

The superintendent of public instruction shall separately calculate and allocate moneys appropriated under RCW 28A.150.260 to school districts for each full-time equivalent student enrolled in an alternative learning experience course. The calculation shall be based on the estimated statewide annual average allocation per full-time equivalent student in grades nine through twelve in general education, excluding small high school enhancements, and including applicable rules and provisions of the omnibus appropriations act.

[ 2013 2nd sp.s. c 18 s 503.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2013 2nd sp.s. c 18 s 503: "Section 503 of this act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [June 30, 2013]." [ 2013 2nd sp.s. c 18 s 602.]

Application—Enforcement of laws protecting health and safety—2013 2nd sp.s. c 18: See note following RCW 28A.600.022.